Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2418
Licensed administrator; when required; provisional
license.

Each nursing home within the state shall
be operated under the supervision of an administrator duly licensed in the
manner provided in the Nursing Home Administrator Practice Act. Each facility within the state operated
primarily for caring for persons with head injuries and associated disorders
shall be operated under the supervision of an administrator duly licensed
in the manner provided in the Nursing Home Administrator Practice Act. If
there is a vacancy in the position of licensed administrator of a nursing
home, the owner, governing body, or other appropriate authority of the nursing
home may select a person to apply for a provisional license in nursing home
administration to serve as the administrator of such facility.

Laws 1972, LB 1040, § 8;

Laws 1980, LB 686, § 5;

Laws 1988, LB 693, § 12;

R.S.Supp.,1988, § 71-2045.04;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-6062;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 833;

Laws 2013, LB42, § 4.